Washington statutes.
RCW 18.06.010

Definitions.

The following terms in this chapter shall have the meanings set forth in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:

(1) "Acupuncture and Eastern medicine" means a health care service utilizing acupuncture or Eastern medicine diagnosis and treatment to promote health and treat organic or functional disorders, which includes a variety of traditional and modern acupuncture and Eastern medicine therapeutic treatments, such as the practice of acupuncture techniques and herbal medicine to maintain and promote wellness, prevent, manage, and reduce pain, and treat substance use disorder. Acupuncture and Eastern medicine includes the following:

(a) Use of presterilized, disposable needles, such as filiform needles, and other acupuncture needles, syringes, or lancets to directly and indirectly stimulate meridians and acupuncture points including ashi points, motor points, trigger points, and other nonspecific points throughout the body;

(b) Use of electrical, mechanical, or magnetic devices to stimulate meridians and acupuncture points including ashi points, motor points, trigger points, and other nonspecific points throughout the body;

(c) Intramuscular needling and dry needling of trigger points and other nonspecific points throughout the body in accordance with acupuncture and Eastern medicine training;

(d) All points and protocols for ear acupuncture including auricular acupuncture, national acupuncture detoxification association protocol, battlefield acupuncture, and the Nogier system;

(e) Use of contact needling and noninsertion tools such as teishin, enshin, or zanshin;

(f) Moxibustion;

(g) Acupressure;

(h) Cupping;

(i) Dermal friction technique;

(j) Infra-red;

(k) Sonopuncture;

(l) Laserpuncture;

(m) Point injection therapy, as defined in rule by the department. Point injection therapy includes injection of substances, limited to saline, sterile water, herbs, minerals, vitamins in liquid form, and homeopathic and nutritional substances, consistent with the practice of acupuncture or Eastern medicine. Point injection therapy also includes injection of local anesthetics, such as lidocaine and procaine, for reduction of pain during point injection therapy, consistent with the practice of acupuncture and Eastern medicine and training requirements as defined in rule. An acupuncturist or acupuncture and Eastern medicine practitioner using point injection therapy who has met the training and education requirements established pursuant to RCW 18.06.230 may use oxygen, and epinephrine for potential emergency purposes, such as an allergic or adverse reaction, for patient care and safety. Point injection therapy does not include injection of controlled substances contained in Schedules I through V of the uniform controlled substances act, chapter 69.50 RCW or steroids as defined in RCW 69.41.300;

(n) Dietary advice and health education based on acupuncture or Eastern medical theory, including the recommendation and sale of herbs, vitamins, minerals, and dietary and nutritional supplements;

(o) Breathing, relaxation, and Eastern exercise techniques;

(p) Qi gong;

(q) Eastern massage and Tui na, which is a method of Eastern bodywork, characterized by the kneading, pressing, rolling, shaking, and stretching of the body and does not include spinal manipulation; and

(r) Superficial heat and cold therapies.

(2) "Acupuncturist" or "acupuncture and Eastern medicine practitioner" means a person licensed under this chapter.

(3) "Department" means the department of health.

(4) "Secretary" means the secretary of health or the secretary's designee.

Nothing in this chapter requires individuals to be licensed as an acupuncturist or acupuncture and Eastern medicine practitioner in order to provide the techniques and services in subsection (1)(n) through (r) of this section or to sell herbal products.

[ 2021 c 87 s 1; 2019 c 308 s 2; 2016 c 97 s 1; 2010 c 286 s 2; 1995 c 323 s 4; 1992 c 110 s 1; 1991 c 3 s 4; 1985 c 326 s 1.]

NOTES:

Findings—2019 c 308: "The legislature finds that acupuncture and Eastern medicine is a holistic system of medicine that has developed through traditional medical practices in China, Japan, Korea, and the other East Asian countries.

The legislature finds that the practice of acupuncture has become mainstream in the health care system nationally and internationally. The legislature intends to align the professional title of acupuncture with state and federal designations for the profession, defining it as a comprehensive system of medicine. For the purposes of this act, the term Eastern medicine is more inclusive of the broader system of medicine and can be used interchangeably with acupuncture.

The legislature does not intend to require persons currently licensed under this chapter to change the business name of their practice if otherwise in compliance with this chapter." [ 2019 c 308 s 1.]